Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-601
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-601 to 71-649 shall be known and may be cited as the Vital Statistics Act.

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 21;

Laws 2018, LB1040, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB966, § 17.